Illinois, session 104th, SB300.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Family Caregiver Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (320 ILCS 65/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Family Caregiver Act. 9(Source: P.A. 93-864, eff. 8-5-04.)